Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-8,311
Semiquincentennial Commission; members; vacancy; termination.

(1) The Semiquincentennial Commission is created. The commission shall be housed within the Nebraska State Historical Society for administrative and budgetary purposes.

(2) The commission shall consist of seventeen members.

(3) The Legislature intends for the commission to include members from all regions of the state, representing all major interests and a diverse array of industries.

(4) The commission shall include the following members:

(a) The Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society or the designee of the director, who shall serve as the chairperson;

(b) The Director of Economic Development or the designee of such person;

(c) The Commissioner of Education or the designee of such person; and

(d) The President of the University of Nebraska or the designee of such person;

(5) The commission shall include at least one member from each of the following subdivisions to be appointed by the Governor before September 1, 2021:

(a) A Native American from a federally recognized Indian tribe, as of January 1, 2021, residing within the State of Nebraska. Such member shall be appointed from a list of five nominees submitted by the Commission on Indian Affairs;

(b) An African American who is a legal resident of the State of Nebraska. Such member shall be appointed from a list of five nominees submitted by the Commission on African American Affairs;

(c) A Latino-American who is a legal resident of the State of Nebraska. Such member shall be appointed from a list of five nominees submitted by the Commission on Latino-Americans;

(d) A curator or director of a private cultural institution as defined in section 58-807.01 or a professional historian;

(e) A member of the Nebraska Tourism Commission;

(f) A representative from the Nebraska Humanities Council;

(g) A legal resident of the first congressional district;

(h) A legal resident of the second congressional district; and

(i) A legal resident of the third congressional district.

(6) The same individual shall not fulfill the requirements of more than one subdivision of subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) No more than eight of the members shall be affiliated with the same political party.

(8) Any vacancy on the commission of an appointed member occurring after the initial appointment of members shall be filled by the Governor by appointment.

(9) The commission shall terminate on June 30, 2027.

Laws 2021, LB275, § 1.